Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5327.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 22. (1) A person shall not knowingly and intentionally
operate an unmanned aircraft system to subject an individual to
harassment. As used in this subsection, "harassment" means that
term as defined in section 411h or 411i of the Michigan penal code,
1931 PA 328, MCL 750.411h and 750.411i.
(2) A person shall not knowingly and intentionally operate an
unmanned aircraft system within a distance that, if the person were
to do so personally rather than through remote operation of an
unmanned aircraft, would be a violation of a restraining order or
JJR H03835'25 (H-3) qidr9s


other judicial order.
(3) A person shall not knowingly and intentionally operate an
unmanned aircraft system to violate section 539j of the Michigan
penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.539j, or to otherwise capture
photographs, video, or audio recordings of an individual in a
manner that would invade the individual's reasonable expectation of
privacy.
(4) An individual who is required to register as a sex
offender under the sex offenders registration act, 1994 PA 295, MCL
28.721 to 28.736, 28.730, shall not operate an unmanned aircraft
system to knowingly and intentionally follow, contact, or capture
images of another individual, if the individual's sentence in a
criminal case would prohibit the individual from following,
contacting, or capturing the image of the other individual.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6), a person
shall not knowingly and intentionally operate an unmanned aircraft
system in a manner that prevents an owner or occupant of a private
dwelling from the quiet enjoyment of that private dwelling. It is
rebuttably presumed that the owner or occupant of a private
dwelling is not prevented from the quiet enjoyment of that private
dwelling by the operation of an unmanned aircraft system over that
private dwelling if both of the following apply:
(a) A telecommunications provider operates the unmanned
aircraft system between 8:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. for a reasonable
amount of time not exceeding 60 minutes to inspect, maintain,
repair, construct, or otherwise work on communications or
telecommunications service facilities installed by the
telecommunications provider at the private dwelling.
(b) The telecommunications provider operates the unmanned
JJR H03835'25 (H-3) qidr9s


aircraft system within the utility easement for the communications
or telecommunications facilities described in subdivision (a).
(6) Subsection (5) does not apply to the operator of an
unmanned aircraft system who receives consent from the owner or
occupant of a private dwelling to operate the unmanned aircraft
over that private dwelling.
(7) As used in subsection (5), "telecommunications provider"
means a business, or an affiliate of that business, that, in part
or in whole, offers telephone, wireless, video, broadband, or other
similar services and that is regulated by either or both of the
following:
(a) The Michigan public service commission under the Michigan
telecommunications act, 1991 PA 179, MCL 484.2101 to 484.2603, or
the uniform video services local franchise act, 2006 PA 480, MCL
484.3301 to 484.3315.
(b) The Federal Communications Commission under the
communications act of 1934, 47 USC 151 to 1754.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days
after the date it is enacted into law.
Final Page
JJR H03835'25 (H-3) qidr9s